West Virginia, session 2025, HB2249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16A-3-1 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (the Safe Harbor Letter for the Medical Cannabis Program, 64 CSR 113), is authorized.